Montana, session 2025, SB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Calling of subsequent district judges -- random selection. (1) When calling in
subsequent district judges, a judge who has been substituted, disqualified for cause, or recused shall follow the
procedure for the random selection of subsequent district judges as established by the office of the court
administrator.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "random selection" means a selection from a larger group by
chance. The random selection of subsequent judges must include a mechanism to ensure that the subsequent
district judge's judicial district is reasonably close geographically to the judicial district of the original judge while
still remaining random.
Section 2. Office of court administrator procedure. By October 1, 2025, the office of the court
administrator shall establish a procedure for the random selection of subsequent district judges for a district
court in which the initial judge has been substituted, disqualified for cause, or recused. The random selection of
subsequent judges must include a mechanism to ensure that the subsequent district judge's judicial district is
reasonably close geographically to the judicial district of the original judge while still remaining random. The
office shall provide the procedure to all district court judges by October 15, 2025.
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 41
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 41
3, chapter 1, part 8, and the provisions of Title 3, chapter 1, part 8, apply to [section 1].
Section 4. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), [this act] is effective on passage
and approval.
(2) [Section 1] is effective October 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 41
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 41, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 41
INTRODUCED BY D. EMRICH
BY REQUEST OF THE SENATE SELECT COMMITTEE ON JUDICIAL OVERSIGHT AND REFORM
AN ACT REQUIRING A SUBSTITUTED OR DISQUALIFIED DISTRICT COURT JUDGE TO FOLLOW A
PROCEDURE THAT PROVIDES FOR THE RANDOM SELECTION OF SUBSEQUENT JUDGES; DEFINING
RANDOM SELECTION; REQUIRING THE OFFICE OF THE COURT ADMINISTRATOR TO ESTABLISH THE
PROCEDURE; AND PROVIDING EFFECTIVE DATES.